Nebraska, session 109, LB146.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB146 LB146
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds
to increase reimbursement rates by twelve and one-half percent for fiscal
year 2025-26 for dental services provided under the Medical Assistance
Act.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-